Washington statutes.
RCW 36.65.040

Method of allocating state revenues.

The method of allocating state revenues shall not be modified for a period of one year from the date the initial officers of the city-county assume office. During the one-year period, state revenue shares shall be calculated as if the preexisting county, cities, and special purpose districts had continued as separate entities. However, distributions of the revenue to the consolidated entities shall be made to the city-county.

[ 1984 c 91 s 4.]